Hawaii, session 2025, SB10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part     .  air filters §196-    Definitions.  As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires: "Disposable air filter" means a filter that is intended for single use as part of a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system or similar system designed to improve or alter indoor air quality. "Reusable air filter" means a filter labeled as washable and able to be reused as part of a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system or similar system designed to improve or alter indoor air quality. §196-    Disposable air filters; prohibited.  It shall be unlawful to sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or use in the State any disposable air filter beginning January 1, 2030. §196-    Reusable air filters.  The State shall establish an air filter standard that recognizes the durability, cost-effectiveness, and environmental benefits of reusable air filters and sets reusable air filters as the new standard for every air filter sold, offered for sale, distributed for sale, or used in the State." SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________